District of Columbia statutes.
7-1207.02

Criminal penalties.

(a)

Except for violations of subchapter V of this chapter, any person who willfully violates the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and such violator shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned for not more than 60 days, or both.

(b)

Any person who knowingly obtains mental health information from a mental health professional, mental health facility or data collector, under false pretenses or through deception, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 702, 25 DCR 5055

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2062.
1973 Ed., § 6-1642.

Prior Codifications